District of Columbia statutes.
31-4502

Alien companies; trustees; examinations; financial statements.

The directors of an alien company may appoint citizens or corporations of the United States, approved by the Commissioner, as its trustees to hold funds and assets in trust for the benefit of the policyholders and creditors of the company in the United States. A certified copy of the record of such appointment and of the deed of trust shall be filed with the Commissioner, who may examine such trustees and any officers and agents, books, and papers of the company in the same manner as he may examine officers, agents, books, papers, and affairs of insurance companies. The funds and assets so held by such trustees shall, with the deposits otherwise made by the company and the funds and assets held by the company in the United States for the benefit of its policyholders and creditors in the United States, constitute the assets of the company for the purpose of making its financial statements required by this subdivision.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1155, ch. 672, ch. IV, § 2
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(l), 44 DCR 1730
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4501.
1973 Ed., § 35-602.
1981 Ed., § 35-702.
This section is referenced in § 31-5326.